Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-1012
Enforcement of act.

(1) Notwithstanding section 75-156, whenever it appears that a private water company has violated, is violating, or is threatening to violate any provision of the Water Service Regulation Act or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, the commission may institute a civil suit in the district court of Lancaster County for (a) injunctive relief to restrain the private water company from continuing the violation or threat of violation, (b) the assessment and recovery of a civil penalty as provided in section 75-1011, or (c) both injunctive relief and civil penalty.

(2) On application for injunctive relief and a finding that a private water company is violating or threatening to violate any provisions of the act or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, the district court shall grant the injunctive relief as the facts may warrant.

(3) At the request of the commission, the county attorney shall institute and pursue a suit in the name of the state for injunctive relief or to recover the civil penalty, or both, as authorized in subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1994, LB 1002, § 12;

Laws 2008, LB755, § 5.
March 20, 2008